Maine, session 132, LD164.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §1984 is enacted to read:
§1984. Authorized emergency vehicles; exemption from tolls
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Authorized emergency vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A, section
2054, subsection 1, paragraph B.
B. "Responding to an emergency" means responding to, working at the scene of or
returning from a fire, emergency medical services or law enforcement call; a hazardous
or toxic materials spill and cleanup; or any other situation to which a fire department,
emergency medical services provider or law enforcement officer has been dispatched.
2. Authorized emergency vehicles; responding to an emergency. The authority may
not charge or collect tolls on an authorized emergency vehicle that is responding to an
emergency.
3. Authorized emergency vehicles; nonemergency situation. The authority may not
charge or collect tolls on an authorized emergency vehicle that is using the turnpike for:
A. Performing a nonemergency medical transport; or
B. Traveling to a repair facility that specializes in maintenance and repair for
authorized emergency vehicles.